Hawaii statutes.
[§201-104] Report. The director of
business, economic development, and tourism shall incorporate the activities of
the past year and any recommendations for specific actions to develop markets
for recycled materials in the department's annual report. [L 1991, c
324, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next